Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1100.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 438. Waiver to Purchase Diapers or Menstrual Hygiene Products.-- (a) If , in accordance with Federal law, the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture creates and makes available to the states a waiver permitting recipients of benefits provided under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children to use their benefits to 1234567891011121314151617 purchase diapers or menstrual hygiene products, including tampons, sanitary napkins or feminine wipes, the following shall apply:(1) If a waiver is made available for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, the department may apply for the Federal waiver. If the waiver is approved, the department shall adopt rules and make changes as necessary to implement the waiver.(2) If a waiver is made available for the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants and Children, the Department of Health may apply for the Federal waiver. If the waiver is approved, the Department of Health shall adopt rules and make changes as necessary to implement the waiver.(b) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall conduct a study to review the costs to the Commonwealth of the implementation of any waiver under subsection (a) that occurs during the three-year period after the waiver is approved in accordance with subsection (a). The following apply:(1) Within two years of the implementation of a waiver under subsection (a), the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall issue a report containing the findings of the study regarding the waiver.(2) The report under paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human 20250HB1100PN1176 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Services Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1100PN1176 - 3 - 12